Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.300

Agricultural activities and forest practices—Legislative finding and purpose.

The legislature finds that agricultural activities conducted on farmland and forest practices in urbanizing areas are often subjected to nuisance lawsuits, and that such suits encourage and even force the premature removal of the lands from agricultural uses and timber production. It is therefore the purpose of RCW 7.48.300 through 7.48.310 and 7.48.905 to provide that agricultural activities conducted on farmland and forest practices be protected from nuisance lawsuits.

[ 1992 c 52 s 2; 1979 c 122 s 1.]